Washington statutes.
RCW 5.28.040

Form may be adapted to religious belief.

When a person is sworn who believes in any other than the Christian religion, he or she may be sworn according to the peculiar ceremonies of his or her religion, if there be any such.

[ 2011 c 336 s 134; 2 H. C. s 1696; 1869 p 379 s 4; RRS s 1267.]